Hawaii statutes.
§291C-104 Speeding in a school zone or
construction area. (a) No person shall drive a motor vehicle at a speed
greater than the maximum speed limit established pursuant to subsection (b)
within a school zone or a construction area; provided that if the person drives
a motor vehicle at a speed greater than thirty miles an hour or more over the
maximum speed limit established in subsection (b), or over eighty miles per
hour or more in a school zone or a construction zone, the provisions of section
291C-105 shall control. Appropriate law enforcement personnel may enforce the
maximum speed limits established for school zones and construction areas.

(b) Section 291C-102 notwithstanding, the
director of transportation and the counties, in their respective jurisdictions,
shall establish maximum speed limits for school zones and construction areas
and shall require the owner, general contractor, or other person responsible
for construction to provide proper signs in construction areas. The director
of transportation shall place official signs in school zones.

Signs posted pursuant to this subsection shall
be plainly visible at all times under ordinary traffic conditions.

(c) Any person who violates this section shall
be fined $250, may be charged with a surcharge of up to $100 to be deposited
into the trauma system special fund, and, where the violation involves speeding
in a school zone, shall be charged with a surcharge of $25 to be deposited into
the safe routes to school program special fund.

(d) For purposes of this section:

"Construction area" includes any area
in which there is occurring the installation, construction, or demolition of
connections for streets, roads, driveways, concrete curbs and sidewalks,
structures, drainage systems, landscaping, or grading within the highway
rights-of-way, including aboveground and underground utility work, excavation
and backfilling of trenches or other openings in state highways, the
restoration, replacement, or repair of the base course, pavement surfaces, highway
structures, or any other highway improvements.

"School zone" means every street and
all public property in the vicinity of a school as designated by the department
of transportation and the counties, in their respective jurisdictions.

(e) The director shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 as may be necessary to implement this section. [L 2000, c 293, §1;
am L 2001, c 138, §1; am L 2006, c 129, §4; am L 2008, c 231, §15; am L 2012, c
317, §3]

Cross References

Violation of rules governing the use of traffic control
devices at work sites; penalty, see §286-8.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next